Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1075.
do enact as follows:AB1075,11Section 1. 20.437 (1) (cL) of the statutes is created to read:AB1075,3,3220.437 (1) (cL) Seventeen-year-old juvenile justice aids. A sum sufficient for 3the purposes under s. 48.5275.AB1075,24Section 2. 48.02 (1d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1075,3,8548.02 (1d) “Adult” means a person who is 18 years of age or older, except that 6for purposes of investigating or prosecuting a person who is alleged to have violated 7any state or federal criminal law or any civil law or municipal ordinance, “adult” 8means a person who has attained 17 years of age.AB1075,39Section 3. 48.02 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1075,3,141048.02 (2) “Child,” when used without further qualification, means a person 11who is less than 18 years of age, except that for purposes of investigating or 12prosecuting a person who is alleged to have violated a state or federal criminal law 13or any civil law or municipal ordinance, “child” does not include a person who has 14attained 17 years of age.AB1075,415Section 4. Subchapter IX (title) of chapter 48 [precedes 48.44] of the statutes 16is amended to read:AB1075,3,1717CHAPTER 48AB1075,3,2018SUBCHAPTER IX19JURISDICTION OVER PERSON 1720OR OLDER ADULTSAB1075,521Section 5. 48.44 of the statutes is amended to read:AB1075,4,32248.44 Jurisdiction over persons 17 or older adults. The court has 1jurisdiction over persons 17 years of age or older adults as provided under ss. 248.133, 48.355 (4), 48.357 (6), 48.365 (5), and 48.45 and as otherwise specifically 3provided in this chapter.AB1075,64Section 6. 48.45 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1075,4,12548.45 (1) (a) If in the hearing of a case of a child alleged to be in a condition 6described in s. 48.13 it appears that any person 17 years of age or older adult has 7been guilty of contributing to, encouraging, or tending to cause by any act or 8omission, such that condition of the child, the judge may make orders with respect 9to the conduct of such that person in his or her relationship to the child, including 10orders determining the ability of the person to provide for the maintenance or care 11of the child and directing when, how, and from where funds for the maintenance or 12care shall be paid.AB1075,713Section 7. 48.45 (1) (am) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1075,4,201448.45 (1) (am) If in the hearing of a case of an unborn child and the unborn 15child’s expectant mother alleged to be in a condition described in s. 48.133 it 16appears that any person 17 years of age or over adult has been guilty of contributing 17to, encouraging, or tending to cause by any act or omission, such that condition of 18the unborn child and expectant mother, the judge may make orders with respect to 19the conduct of such that person in his or her relationship to the unborn child and 20expectant mother.AB1075,821Section 8. 48.45 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1075,5,42248.45 (3) If it appears at a court hearing that any person 17 years of age or 23older adult has violated s. 948.40, the judge shall refer the record to the district 1attorney for criminal proceedings as may be warranted in the district attorney’s 2judgment. This subsection does not prevent prosecution of violations of s. 948.40 3without the prior reference by the judge to the district attorney, as in other criminal 4cases.AB1075,95Section 9. 48.5275 of the statutes is created to read:AB1075,5,10648.5275 Seventeen-year-old juvenile justice aids. Notwithstanding s. 748.526, from the appropriation under s. 20.437 (1) (cL), beginning on January 1, 82026, the department shall reimburse counties for the costs under s. 48.526 (2) (c) 9associated with juveniles who were alleged to have violated a state or federal 10criminal law or any civil law or municipal ordinance at age 17.AB1075,1011Section 10. 118.163 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1075,5,1312118.163 (4) A person who is under 17 years of age a minor on the date of 13disposition is subject to s. 938.342.AB1075,1114Section 11. 125.07 (4) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1075,5,1815125.07 (4) (d) A person who is under 17 years of age a minor on the date of 16disposition is subject to s. 938.344 unless proceedings have been instituted against 17the person in a court of civil or criminal jurisdiction after dismissal of the citation 18under s. 938.344 (3).AB1075,1219Section 12. 125.07 (4) (e) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1075,5,2120125.07 (4) (e) 1. In this paragraph, “defendant” means a person found guilty of 21violating par. (a) or (b) who is 17, 18, 19 or 20 an adult under 21 years of age.AB1075,1322Section 13. 125.085 (3) (bt) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1075,6,323125.085 (3) (bt) A person who is under 17 years of age a minor on the date of 1disposition is subject to s. 938.344 unless proceedings have been instituted against 2the person in a court of civil or criminal jurisdiction after dismissal of the citation 3under s. 938.344 (3).AB1075,144Section 14. 165.83 (1) (c) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1075,6,65165.83 (1) (c) 1. An act that is committed by a person who has attained the 6age of 17 an adult and that is a felony or a misdemeanor.AB1075,157Section 15. 165.83 (1) (c) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1075,6,108165.83 (1) (c) 2. An act that is committed by a person minor who has attained 9the age of 10 but who has not attained the age of 17 and that would be a felony or 10misdemeanor if committed by an adult.AB1075,1611Section 16. 301.12 (2m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1075,6,1412301.12 (2m) The liability specified in sub. (2) shall not apply to persons 17 13and older adults receiving care, maintenance, services, and supplies provided by 14prisons named in s. 302.01.AB1075,1715Section 17. 301.12 (14) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1075,7,416301.12 (14) (a) Except as provided in pars. (b) and (c), liability of a person 17specified in sub. (2) or s. 301.03 (18) for care and maintenance of persons under 17 18years of age minors in residential, nonmedical facilities such as group homes, foster 19homes, residential care centers for children and youth, and juvenile correctional 20institutions is determined in accordance with the cost-based fee established under 21s. 301.03 (18). The department shall bill the liable person up to any amount of 22liability not paid by an insurer under s. 632.89 (2) or (4m) or by other 3rd-party 23benefits, subject to rules that include formulas governing ability to pay 1promulgated by the department under s. 301.03 (18). Any liability of the resident 2not payable by any other person terminates when the resident reaches age 17 3becomes an adult, unless the liable person has prevented payment by any act or 4omission.AB1075,185Section 18. 302.31 (7) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1075,7,116302.31 (7) The temporary placement of persons in the custody of the 7department, other than persons under 17 years of age minors, and persons who 8have attained the age of 17 years but have not attained adults under the age of 25 9years who are under the supervision of the department under s. 938.355 (4) and 10who have been taken into custody pending revocation of community supervision or 11aftercare supervision under s. 938.357 (5) (e).AB1075,1912Section 19. 938.02 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1075,7,1613938.02 (1) “Adult” means a person who is 18 years of age or older, except that 14for purposes of investigating or prosecuting a person who is alleged to have violated 15any state or federal criminal law or any civil law or municipal ordinance, “adult” 16means a person who has attained 17 years of age.AB1075,2017Section 20. 938.02 (10m) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1075 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1075 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1075 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1075 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1075: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting